Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 1. Establishment and Organization.

Sec. 42.40.010.
Establishment of the corporation.

There is established the Alaska Railroad Corporation. The corporation is a public corporation and is an instrumentality of the state within the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.
The corporation has a legal existence independent of and separate from the state. The continued operation of the Alaska Railroad by the corporation as provided in this chapter is considered an essential government function of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Because the legislature set up the railroad as a “public corporation” in 1984 and, the next year, statutorily commanded public corporations and all other organizational units of the executive branch (without exception) to comply with the mandates of the Equal Employment Opportunity Act (former AS

44.19.441

— 44.19.449), the railroad is subject to the provisions of that act.
November 6, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.40.020.
Board of directors.

The powers of the corporation are vested in the board of directors. The board consists of the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, and five members appointed by the governor. The five appointed members must be registered voters in the state except as provided in (1) and (2) of this subsection. Except for the commissioners and the member appointed under (5) of this subsection, a member may not be a state officer or employee. Appointed members shall have the following qualifications:

one member of the board shall be a person who has at least 10 years of experience in railroad management; a person who is not a resident of the state may be appointed under this paragraph;

one member of the board shall be or have been an executive official of a United States railroad and shall be selected in accordance with any requirements imposed under 49 U.S.C. (Interstate Commerce Act); a person who is not a resident of the state may be appointed under this paragraph;

at least one member shall be from each judicial district directly served by the Alaska Railroad;

one member shall have at least five years experience as an owner or manager of a business in the state;

one member shall be an employee who is a member of a bargaining unit representing employees of the corporation.

Except for the commissioners, the members of the board shall be confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. A member appointed by the governor has the full powers and responsibilities of a confirmed board member until the member is rejected by the legislature or the legislature adjourns without confirming the member.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 42.40.030.
Term of office.

Except for the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, members of the board serve for staggered terms of five years each at the pleasure of the governor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 42.40.040.
Vacancies.

Except for the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, a vacancy on the board is filled by appointment by the governor, and the appointment must be confirmed by the members of the legislature in joint session. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), a member appointed to fill a vacancy holds office for the balance of the term for which the member’s predecessor was appointed.

A vacancy on the board does not impair the authority of a quorum of members to exercise the powers and perform the duties of the board.

A member of the board whose term has expired shall serve until a successor has been appointed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 18 ch 80 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 42.40.050.
Compensation and expenses.

An appointed member of the board is entitled to compensation at a rate of $400 for each day the member is engaged in the actual performance of duties as a member of the board. The board may provide by rule for compensation for partial days during which an appointed member is engaged in actual performance of duties as a member of the board.

In addition to compensation under (a) of this section, an appointed member of the board is entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for state boards and commissions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

For travel and per diem for boards and commissions, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 42.40.060.
Board officers.

The board shall elect from its membership a chairman and vice-chairman and prescribe their duties by rule.

The board shall appoint a secretary and prescribe the duties of the secretary.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)